Utah statutes.
54-8-2.   Legislative purpose.

The Legislature finds that in many areas of the state, it is in the public interest to convert existing overhead electric and communication facilities to underground locations through the creation of an improvement district. The Legislature hereby declares that a public purpose will be served by providing a procedure to accomplish such conversion and that it is in the public interest to provide for such conversion by proceedings taken pursuant to this chapter whether such areas be within the limits of a city or town or within a county.



Enacted by Chapter 157, 1969 General Session

